Utah statutes.
17B-2a-806.   Authority of the state or an agency of the state with respect to a public transit district -- Counties and municipalities authorized to provide funds to public transit district.

(1)  The state or an agency of the state may:

(a)  make public contributions to a public transit district as in the judgment of the Legislature or governing board of the agency are necessary or proper;

(b)  authorize a public transit district to perform, or aid and assist a public transit district in performing, an activity that the state or agency is authorized by law to perform.

(2) (a)  A county or municipality involved in the establishment and operation of a public transit district may provide funds necessary for the operation and maintenance of the district.

(b)  A county's use of property tax funds to establish and operate a public transit district within any part of the county is a county purpose under Section 17-53-220.



Enacted by Chapter 329, 2007 General Session

